dev/mt_wiktionary/noun.all.fat.dix
  <!-- interazzjoni_fundamentali; interazzjoni; 2 -->
    <pardef n="interazzjoni/_fundamentali__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>_fundamentali</l>
          <r>_fundamentali<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiet<b/>fundamentali</l>
          <r>_fundamentali<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- liberazzjoni; liberazzjoni; 2 -->
    <pardef n="liberazzjoni__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- pjaneta; pjanet; 2 -->
    <pardef n="pjanet/a__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- formazzjoni; formazzjoni; 2 -->
    <pardef n="formazzjoni__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="interazzjoni_fundamentali"><i>interazzjoni</i><par n="interazzjoni/_fundamentali__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="liberazzjoni"><i>liberazzjoni</i><par n="liberazzjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pjaneta"><i>pjanet</i><par n="pjanet/a__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="formazzjoni"><i>formazzjoni</i><par n="formazzjoni__n_f"/></e>
